Utah statutes.
16-15-109.   Registered agent.

(1)  A business trust shall continuously maintain an agent in this state for service of process on the business trust.

(2)  The agent of the business trust shall be a person residing or authorized to do business in this state.

(3)  If a business trust fails to maintain a registered agent in this state, the division may cancel the business trust's registration.

(4) (a)  The registered agent of a business trust may resign by filing an original and one copy of a signed written notice of resignation with the division.  The division shall mail a copy of the notice of resignation to the registered office of the business trust at the street address in the business trust's certificate of registration.

(b)  The appointment of the registered agent ends 30 days after the division receives notice of the resignation.

(5)  Service may be effected on a business trust in the same manner prescribed for a corporation in Sections 16-10a-1511 and 16-10a-1521.

